Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2327
Public funds; depository bonds; expiration.

All bonds given to secure deposits of public money by the state or by any county, except for deposit guaranty bonds defined under section 77-2387, shall expire on January 1 of each year.

Laws 1927, c. 34, § 4, p. 158;

C.S.1929, § 77-2509;

Laws 1933, c. 128, § 1, p. 504;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2509;

R.S.1943, § 77-2327;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 37.

Bond given by state bank to secure school district deposit is valid obligation of sureties, notwithstanding absence of statute expressly granting such authority. School District of City of Bayard v. Vanatta, 123 Neb. 216, 242 N.W. 435 (1932).

It is lawful for bank to give depository bond to school district to secure deposit of its funds, and sureties thereon are bound thereby. Liberty High School District of Sioux County v. Currie, 122 Neb. 173, 240 N.W. 286 (1931).